North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-04 Supervision of Issue and Sale of Securities
10-04-19.
Evidentiary matters.

In any action, civil or criminal, when a defense is based upon any exemption provided for in this chapter, the burden of proving the existence of such exemption shall be upon the party raising such defense.

In any action, civil or criminal, a certificate signed and sealed by the commissioner, stating compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter, shall constitute prima facie evidence of such compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter and shall be admissible in any such action.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 19; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0419.

10-04-20.
Repeal of certain prior laws, saving of certain rights and liabilities thereunder. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.